Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB335.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 209(d) of the act of December 19, 1996 (P.L.1478, No.190), entitled "An act relating to the recycling and reuse of waste tires; providing for the proper disposal of waste tires and the cleanup of stockpiled tires; authorizing investment tax credits for utilizing waste tires; providing remediation grants for the cleanup of tire piles and for pollution prevention programs for small business and households; 1234567891011121314151617181920212223 establishing the Small Business and Household Pollution Prevention Program and management standards for small business hazardous waste; providing for a household hazardous waste program and for grant programs; making appropriations; and making repeals," is amended to read:Section 209. Grants for collection events.* * *(d) Other limitations.--No more than [$100,000] $250,000 per fiscal year may be expended by the department for collection events in any one county.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250SB0335PN0271 - 2 - 1234567891011